Nevada, session 83, AB569.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Veterans Services the sum of $67,187 for
the replacement of utility vehicles and a truck at the Southern
Nevada Veterans Memorial Cemetery.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Veterans Services the sum of $34,390 for
the replacement of a mower at the Southern Nevada Veterans
Memorial Cemetery.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Veterans Services the sum of $120,000
for the replacement of security and safety equipment at the Southern
Nevada Veterans Memorial Cemetery.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Veterans Services the sum of $194,935
for the replacement of a dump truck and the purchase of a tracked
loader vehicle for the Northern Nevada Veterans Memorial
Cemetery.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Veterans Services the sum of $4,622 for
the costs of a video conference system.
Sec. 6. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 7. 1. This section and sections 1, 3 and 6 of this act
become effective on July 1, 2025.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. Sections 2, 4 and 5 of this act become effective on July 1,
2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)